District of Columbia statutes.
48-902.07

Schedule III tests.

The Mayor shall place a substance in Schedule III if the Mayor finds that:

(1)

The substance has a potential for abuse less than the substances listed in Schedules I and II;

(2)

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or the District of Columbia; and

(3)

The abuse of the substance may lead to moderate or low physical dependence or high psychological dependence.

History

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 207, 28 DCR 3081

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-517.